Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.140

City manager—Substitute.

The council may designate a qualified administrative officer of the city or town to perform the duties of manager:

(1) Upon the adoption of the council-manager plan, pending the selection and appointment of a manager; or

(2) Upon the termination of the services of a manager, pending the selection and appointment of a new manager; or

(3) During the absence, disability, or suspension of the manager.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.140. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 19; prior: 1943 c 271 s 14, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-23, part.]